Nebraska, session 109, LB1218.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1218 LB1218
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 39-2805, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
39-2805 (1) The County Bridge Match Program is created. The
department shall administer the program using funds from the
Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund. The purpose of the program is to
promote innovative solutions and provide additional funding to accelerate
the repair and replacement of deficient bridges on the county road
system. Participation by counties in the program shall be voluntary.
(2)(a) (2) The County Bridge Match Working Group is hereby created.
The Governor shall appoint two representatives to serve on the working
group from a list of county highway superintendents, county surveyors, or
county engineers submitted by a statewide association representing county
officials. The Director-State Engineer shall select three representatives
of the department to serve on the working group. The working group shall
develop the program, including participation criteria and matching fund
requirements for counties, and shall score the applications and award the
funds. A meeting of the working group does not constitute a meeting as
defined in section 84-1409.
(b) The working group shall award at least four million dollars to
applicants each fiscal year under the County Bridge Match Program.
(3) The County Bridge Match Program terminates on June 30, 2029.
Sec. 2. Section 66-4,100, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
66-4,100 (1) The Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash
Fund are hereby created. If bonds are issued pursuant to subsection (2)
of section 39-2223, the balance of the share of the Highway Trust Fund
allocated to the Department of Transportation and deposited into the
Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as provided in subsection
(8) of section 39-2215 and the balance of the money deposited in the
Highway Restoration and Improvement Bond Fund as provided in section
39-2215.01 shall be transferred by the State Treasurer, on or before the
-2-

LB1218 LB1218
2026 2026
last day of each month, to the Highway Cash Fund. If no bonds are issued
pursuant to subsection (2) of section 39-2223, the share of the Highway
Trust Fund allocated to the Department of Transportation shall be
transferred by the State Treasurer on or before the last day of each
month to the Highway Cash Fund.
(2) The Legislature may direct the State Treasurer to transfer funds
from the Highway Cash Fund to the Roads Operations Cash Fund. Both funds
shall be expended by the department for:
(a) Acquiring (1) for acquiring real estate, road materials,
equipment, and supplies to be used in the construction, reconstruction,
improvement, and maintenance of state highways; ,
(b) The (2) for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, and
maintenance of state highways, including grading, drainage, structures,
surfacing, roadside development, landscaping, and other incidentals
necessary for proper completion and protection of state highways as the
department shall, after investigation, find and determine shall be for
the best interests of the highway system of the state, either independent
of or in conjunction with federal-aid money for highway purposes; ,
(c) The (3) for the share of the department of the cost of
maintenance of state aid bridges; ,
(d) Planning (4) for planning studies in conjunction with federal
highway funds for the purpose of analyzing traffic problems and financial
conditions and problems relating to state, county, township, municipal,
federal, and all other roads in the state and for incidental costs in
connection with the federal-aid grade crossing program for roads not on
state highways; ,
(e) Tests (5) for tests and research by the department or
proportionate costs of membership, tests, and research of highway
organizations when participated in by the highway departments of other
states; ,
(f) The (6) for the payment of expenses and costs of the Board of
-3-

LB1218 LB1218
2026 2026
Examiners for County Highway and City Street Superintendents as set forth
in section 39-2310; ,
(g) Support (7) for support of the public transportation assistance
program established under section 13-1209 and the intercity bus system
assistance program established under section 13-1213; ,
(h) Purchasing (8) for purchasing from political or governmental
subdivisions or public corporations, pursuant to section 39-1307, any
federal-aid transportation funds available to such entities; ,
(i) Costs (9) for costs related to the administration of the
Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation as specified
in section 3-107; ,
(j) Furnishing (10) for furnishing the Nebraska Broadband Office
with necessary office space, furniture, equipment, and supplies as well
as providing administrative and budgetary support, including salaries for
professional, technical, and clerical assistants, as provided in section
81-702; , and
(k) The (11) for the County Bridge Match Program.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer five four million dollars
from the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the Transportation Infrastructure
Bank Fund on or before June 30, 2026 2024, on such dates and in such
amounts as directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of
the Department of Administrative Services. The money shall be used for
the County Bridge Match Program. The State Treasurer shall transfer five
four million dollars from the Roads Operations Cash Fund to the
Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund on or before June 30, 2027 2025,
on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator
of the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services. The
money shall be used for the County Bridge Match Program.
(4) Any money in the Highway Cash Fund and the Roads Operations Cash
Fund not needed for current operations of the department shall, as
directed by the Director-State Engineer to the State Treasurer, be
-4-

LB1218 LB1218
2026 2026
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, subject to
approval by the board of each investment. All income received as a result
of such investment shall be placed in the Highway Cash Fund.
Sec. 3. Original sections 39-2805 and 66-4,100, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-5-